Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1673.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Appropriation; law enforcement crime victim notification fund; exemption A. The sum of $5,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the law enforcement crime victim notification fund established by section 41-2414, Arizona Revised Statutes. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.